Washington statutes.
RCW 35.17.440

Abandonment—Method.

Upon the filing of a petition praying therefor, signed by not less than twenty-five percent of the registered voters resident in the city, a special election shall be called at which the following proposition only shall be submitted: "Shall the city of (name of city) abandon its organization as a city under the commission form and become a city under the general laws governing cities of like population?"

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.17.440. Prior: 1911 c 116 s 23, part; RRS s 9112, part.]